Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 321.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires another meaning:

“Board” means the State Board of Medical Practice established by chapter 23 of this title.

“Disciplinary action” means any action taken against a licensee or an applicant by the Board, or on appeal from that action, when that action suspends, revokes, limits, or conditions licensure in any way, or when it includes reprimands or an administrative penalty.

“Practice of podiatry,” by a podiatric physician, means any medical, mechanical, surgical, electrical, manipulation, strapping, or bandaging treatment of the ailments pertaining to the human foot and lower leg distal to the myotendinous junction of the triceps surae. If spinal or general anesthesia is required, it shall be administered by a health care professional regulated under this title who is authorized to administer anesthesia within the scope of his or her practice. In the case of amputations other than toe amputations and in the case of surgical treatment at or above the ankle, the surgical treatment shall be performed only in a general hospital licensed under 18 V.S.A. chapter 43 or a certified ambulatory surgical center as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 9432

. For purposes of this section, “ankle” means the joint between the tibia and fibula proximally and the talus distally.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 93

, § 6;

1985, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 30, 1986;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a);

1999, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2011, No. 61

, § 1, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 322.
Repealed. 2011, No. 61, § 9, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 323.
Repealed.
1985, No. 256 (Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 30, 1986.

§ 324.
Prohibitions; penalties.

No person shall practice or attempt to practice podiatry or hold himself or herself out as being able to do so in this State without first having obtained a license under this chapter.

No person shall use in connection with the person’s name, letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a podiatrist unless the person is licensed under this chapter.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $10,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 30, 1986;

2011, No. 61

, § 1, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 325.
Repealed.
1985, No. 256 (Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 30, 1986.

§ 325a.
Construction.

This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict in any manner the right of a practitioner of another occupation that is regulated by this State from carrying on in the usual manner any of the functions of his or her profession.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 30, 1986.